Idaho, session 2025, S1019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The Legislature finds and declares that
the practice of "swatting," which is the act of maliciously or recklessly
submitting false reports in order to send an armed law enforcement response
to private or public places, presents a grave danger to the health and safety
of both citizens and law enforcement in this state.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-3313, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-3313. FALSE REPORTS OF EXPLOSIVES IN PUBLIC OR PRIVATE PLACES A
FELONY -- PENALTY. Any person who reports, or causes any report to be made,
to any police officer, sheriff, employee of a police department or sher-
iff's office, employee of a 911 emergency communications system or emergency
vehicle dispatch center, employee of a fire department or fire service,
prosecuting attorney, newspaper, radio station, television station, deputy
sheriff, deputy prosecuting attorney, member of the state police, employee
of an airline, employee of an airport, employee of a railroad or bus line,
an employee of a telephone company, occupants of a building, employee of a
school district, or a news reporter in the employ of a newspaper or radio
or television station, that a bomb or other explosive has been placed or
secreted in a public or private place knowing that such report is false, is
guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to a term
of not to exceed five (5) years in the state penitentiary.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 33, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-3313A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-3313A. FALSE REPORTS OF VIOLENCE OR EMERGENCY IN PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PLACES -- PENALTY. (1) Excluding explosives as set forth in section 18-3313,
Idaho Code, any person who reports, or causes any report to be made, to any
police officer, sheriff, employee of a police department or sheriff's of-
fice, employee of a 911 communications system or emergency vehicle dispatch
center, employee of a fire department or fire service, prosecuting attor-


ney, newspaper, radio station, television station, deputy sheriff, deputy
prosecuting attorney, member of the state police, employee of an airline,
employee of an airport, employee of a railroad or bus line, employee of a
telephone company, occupants of a building, employee of a school district,
or news reporter in the employ of a newspaper or radio or television station
that an emergency exists in a public or private place, knowing that the re-
port is false, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to a term of
imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year or a fine of no more than five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(2) A person is guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced to a term of
imprisonment not to exceed five (5) years or a fine of no more than twenty-
five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both, if:
(a) The damages caused by a violation of this section exceed one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000); or
(b) Any person suffers great bodily harm, permanent disfigurement, or
permanent disability due to a violation of this section.
(3) A person is guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced to a term of
imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years and shall be fined in an amount no
more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) if a violation of this sec-
tion results in the death of any person.
(4) For purposes of this section, "private place" or "private places"
shall include but are not limited to:
(a) Habitation, including but not limited to any building, inhabitable
structure, or conveyance of any kind, whether the building, inhabit-
able structure, or conveyance is temporary or permanent, mobile or im-
mobile, including a tent, and is designed to be occupied by people lodg-
ing at night, and includes a dwelling in which a person resides either
temporarily or permanently or is visiting as an invited guest, and in-
cludes the curtilage of any such dwelling;
(b) A place of business or employment, including but not limited to a
commercial enterprise or establishment owned by a person as all or part
of the person's livelihood or that is under the owner's control or un-
der control of an employee or agent of the owner with responsibility for
protecting persons and property and shall include the interior and ex-
terior premises of the place of business or employment;
(c) A vehicle, including but not limited to any motorized vehicle that
is self-propelled and designed for use on public highways to transport
people or property; and
(d) Any other place, area, structure, enclosure, or location where a
person retains, or is otherwise provided with, the expectation of pri-
vacy pursuant to state law, including political subdivisions thereof,
or federal or constitutional law.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.